Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 1 General Provisions

§ 11-1-101.
Definitions.

As used in title 11, unless the context otherwise requires or unless otherwise specifically noted:

“Board” means the state board of agriculture;

“Director” means the director of the department of agriculture for the state of Wyoming or his designated representative;

“Crop” or “agricultural crop,” when not otherwise defined by statute, means corn, oats, wheat, barley, flax, sorghums and other grains, potatoes, vegetables, hay, wheatgrasses (agropyron species), needlegrasses (stipa species), bluegrasses (poa species), fescue grasses (festuca species), grama grasses (bouteloua species), sedges and rushes, shrubby or woody forage plants which include salt sages (atriplex species), sagebrushes (artemisia species), winterfat (eurotia lanata), and forage legumes which include astragalus, lupinus and other members of the family leguminosae;

“Department” means the Wyoming department of agriculture;

“Person” includes an individual, partnership, corporation, joint stock company or any other association or entity, public or private.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 85, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-1; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-1-102.
Disposition of revenue.

Except as otherwise provided
by law, all licensing, registration and service fees collected by
the department together with such other monies as may accrue by law
to the department shall be deposited with the state treasurer and
credited to the general fund.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 102, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-4.1; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-2-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-1-103.
Penalty for violations.

A person who violates
any of the following sections commits a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more
than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both for the first
offense, or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine
of not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00), or
both for second or subsequent offenses: W.S. 11-6-210(a) or (f),

11-18-112

,

11-19-101

,

11-19-102

,

11-19-103

,

11-19-111

,

11-19-210

,

11-19-215

,

11-19-304

,

11-19-306

,

11-19-401

,

11-20-114

,

11-20-117

,

11-20-229

,

11-20-230

,

11-21-104

,

11-22-118

,

11-23-106

,

11-23-207

,

11-24-103

,

11-24-106

, 11-26-101(b),

11-30-114

and

11-48-102

.
A person who violates board rules promulgated pursuant to W.S. 11-18-103(a)(v) shall be subject to the penalties specified in this section.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 98, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, § 2; 1996, ch. 46, § 2; 2001, ch. 26, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 2006, ch. 39, § 2; 2011, ch. 21, § 1; ch. 96, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “11-20-230” in the first sentence.

Laws 2006, ch. 39, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by Laws 2011, ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, inserted “and

11-48-102

,” and made related changes.

The second 2011 amendment, by Laws 2011, ch. 96, § 1, inserted “11-19-103.”

Laws 2011, ch. 96, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming Legislative Service office.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, by ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, added “11-19-210,

11-19-215

,

11-19-304

,

11-19-306

” to the string of references in the section.

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, added “11-24-103” following “11-23-207”; and added “11-26-101(b)” following “11-24-106.”

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

§ 11-1-104.
License
and regulation by the department of agriculture; fee.

The department shall collect a minimum annual fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first license or activity issued or regulated under subsection (b) of this section which shall be deposited in the general fund. An additional annual fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) shall be collected for each subsequent license issued or activity regulated under subsection (b) of this section. No person shall be required to pay more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) in any calendar year for each place of business even if the person obtains more than four (4) licenses from the department.

The fee imposed by subsection (a) of this section shall be collected upon the following persons or activities:

Aerial hunting permit under W.S.

11-6-105

;

Apiary registration under W.S.

11-7-212

;

Resident and nonresident nursery stock dealers and salesmen licensed under W.S.

11-9-102

;

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 46, § 2.

Seed dealers licensed under W.S.

11-12-103

;

Aircraft registration under W.S. 35-7-373(b);

through (xi) Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 4.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 21, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 191, § 2.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 135, § 1; ch. 160, § 2; 1994, ch. 46, § 2; 1995, ch. 21, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 37, § 4; 2009, ch. 191, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed former (b)(xiii) which read: “Persons with regulated weights, measures, weighing or measuring devices under W.S.

40-10-117

through

40-10-136

.”